Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Chapter 3

Lis Pendens

20-3-101. Filing of abstract — Effect of not filing.

When any person, in any court of record, by declaration, petition, bill or cross bill, seeks to fix a lien lis pendens on real estate, or any interest in real estate, situated in the county of suit, in furtherance of the setting aside of a fraudulent conveyance, of subjection of property under return of nulla bona, tracing a trust fund, enforcing an equitable vendor's lien, or otherwise, that person shall file for record in the register's office of the county an abstract, certified by the clerk, containing the names of the parties to the suit, a description of the real estate affected, its ownership and a brief statement of the nature and amount of the lien sought to be fixed.

Until the abstract is so filed, so far as concerns the rights of bona fide purchasers and encumbrancers, for value, of the realty, or any interest in the realty, they shall not be affected.

Code 1932, § 8053; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-301.

Cross-References. Registration of abstract, §§25-5-107 —25-5-109.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), §§ 89, 90, 329.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-801.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Lis Pendens, §§ 3, 5.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Recording System (Toxey H. Sewell), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (1982).

Comparative Legislation. Lis pendens:

Ala. Code §35-4-130 et seq.

Ark. Code §16-59-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §23-1-18.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 382.440 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §11-47-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 527.260.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 1-116 et seq.

Va. Code §§ 8.01-268, 8.01-269.

Cited: In re Airport-81 Nursing Care, Inc., 29 B.R. 501, 1983 Bankr. LEXIS 6536 (Bankr. E.D. Tenn. 1983); In re Adams, 57 B.R. 1, 1983 Bankr. LEXIS 4826 (Bankr. M.D. Tenn. 1983); In re Bell, 55 B.R. 246, 1985 Bankr. LEXIS 4923 (Bankr. M.D. Tenn. 1985); Atkins v. Marks, 288 S.W.3d 356, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 349 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 11, 2008); Smith v. Smith, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Tenn. App. LEXIS 557 (Tenn. Ct. App. Sept. 24, 2008); Haggard v. Aguilar, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 760 (Tenn. Ct. App. Dec. 7, 2010); Barone v. Barone, — S.W.3d —, 2012 Tenn. App. LEXIS 218 (Tenn. Ct. App. Apr. 3, 2012).

20-3-102. Duties of register.

It is the duty of the register immediately to file the abstract and to record the abstract in the lien book.

Code 1932, § 8055; T.C.A (orig. ed.), § 20-303.

Law Reviews.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707.

20-3-103. Termination of action in which filed.

Where the suit, abstract of the claimed lien in which has been filed and recorded, finally terminates, whether on the merits or otherwise, the court may direct the entry on the lien book in the registry of an order respecting the suit made by it, which order, certified by the clerk, shall be presented to the register, who shall immediately note its date and record it on the lien book at the proper place.

Should no such order be entered by the court, it is the duty of the plaintiff or complainant who filed the notice abstract to cause to be noted of record the fact of termination, or, if the claim is satisfied, the satisfaction of the claim, such notation to be attested in writing by the register or the register's deputy.

Code 1932, § 8056; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-304.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-801.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 8 Tenn. Juris., Covenants, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Preferences, Priorities, and Powers of the State in the Collection of Delinquent Revenue: Tennessee's Tax Enforcement Procedures Act (Donald J. Serkin), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 707.

Collateral References. 51 Am. Jur. 2d Lis Pendens §§ 26-28, 32-34, 38.

54 C.J.S. Lis Pendens § 37.

Appeal, writ of error, or motion for new trial, protection, during time allowed for. 10 A.L.R. 415.

Duration of operation of lis pendens as ground upon diligent prosecution of suit. 8 A.L.R.2d 986.

Lis Pendens
11.

20-3-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §20-3-104 (Code 1932, § 8057; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-305; modified), concerning fees, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 87, § 1.

20-3-105. Lien on real estate.

When any person in a court of record seeks to fix a lien lis pendens on real estate, or any interest in real estate, and the court in furtherance of the lien issues a restraining order, the restraining order shall be valid for ninety (90) days only unless:

The court orders a longer period of time to apply; or

Bond is given for the value of the property involved by the party seeking the order.

The abstract filed in the register's office pursuant to this part shall contain information relevant to any restraining order and the duration of the restraining order.

Acts 1983, ch. 105, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).